Utah statutes.
41-6a-1706.   Occupancy of a trailer or semitrailer while being moved on
highway prohibited.
(1)  A person may not occupy a trailer or semitrailer while it is being drawn
by a motor vehicle on a public highway.
(2)  This section does not apply to a:
(a)  livestock trailer or livestock semitrailer;
(b)  trailer or semitrailer being used for participation in a parade; or
(c)  trailer or semitrailer being used in an agricultural operation.
